Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 352.287 is amended to read:
352.287. (1) The governing board of a public  university listed in ORS 352.002 shall exempt a
student who  is not a citizen or a lawful permanent resident of the United States from paying non-
resident tuition and fees for enrollment as an undergraduate student and as a  graduate student in
a degree program at a public university listed in ORS 352.002 if the student:
(a) During each of the  three years immediately prior to receiving a high school diploma or a
modified diploma or leaving school before receiving a high  school diploma or a modified diploma,
attended an elementary or a secondary school in this state;
(b) During each of the five years immediately prior to receiving a  high school diploma or a
modified diploma or leaving school before receiving a high  school diploma or a modified diploma,
attended an elementary or a secondary school in any state or  territory of the United States, the
District of Columbia or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico;
(c) Received a high school diploma or a modified diploma from a secondary school  in this state
or received the equivalent of a high school diploma; and
(d) Shows intention  to become a citizen or a lawful permanent resident of the United States by
submitting to  the public university the student attends or plans to attend an official copy of the
student’s application to  register with a federal immigration program or federal deportation deferral
program or a statement of intent  that the student will seek to obtain citizenship as permitted under
federal law.
(2) The  governing board shall exempt a student who is financially dependent upon a person who
is not a citizen or a lawful permanent  resident of the United States from paying nonresident tuition
and fees  for enrollment as an undergraduate student and as a graduate student in a degree program
at a public university listed in ORS 352.002 if the student:
(a) During each of the three years immediately prior to receiving a high  school diploma or a
modified diploma or leaving school before receiving  a high school diploma or a modified diploma,
attended an elementary or a secondary school in this state and resided in this state with the person
upon whom the student is dependent;
(b) During each of the five  years immediately prior to receiving a high school diploma or a
modified diploma or leaving school before receiving  a high school diploma or a modified diploma,
attended an elementary or a secondary school  in any state or territory of the United States, the
Enrolled House Bill 2586 (HB 2586-A) Page 1
District of Columbia or the Commonwealth of  Puerto Rico and resided with the person upon whom
the student is dependent;
(c) Received a high  school diploma or a modified diploma from a secondary school in this state
or received the equivalent of a high school diploma; and
(d) For a student who is not already a citizen or lawful  permanent resident of the United States,
shows intention to  become a citizen or a lawful permanent resident of the United States by sub-
mitting to the public university the student attends or plans to attend an official copy of the
student’s application to register with a federal immigration program or federal  deportation deferral
program or a statement of intent  that the student will seek to obtain citizenship as permitted under
federal law.
(3) A student who is a citizen or a lawful permanent resident of the  United States and who has
resided outside of Oregon for more than three years while serving  in the Armed Forces of the
United States, but who otherwise meets the requirements of subsection (1) or  (2) of this section,
shall qualify for exemption from nonresident tuition and fees for enrollment as an  undergraduate
student and a graduate student in  a degree program at a public university listed in ORS 352.002
without having to reestablish residency in Oregon.
(4) A student who  is a COFA islander and who has not previously established residence in any
state or  territory of the United States or the District of Columbia other than Oregon shall qualify
for exemption from nonresident  tuition and fees for enrollment as an undergraduate student and a
graduate student in a degree program at a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(5) A student who is a refugee , asylum seeker  or  special immigrant visa holder and who has
not previously established  residence in any state or territory of the United States or the District
of Columbia other than Oregon shall qualify for exemption from  nonresident tuition and fees for
enrollment as an undergraduate student and a graduate student in a degree program at a  public
university listed in ORS 352.002.
(6) The governing board shall adopt standards to implement the provisions of this section.
(7) Not later than July 1 of each year, the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission shall
report to the Speaker of the  House of Representatives, the President of the Senate and the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly with subject matter authority over higher education, for  the
preceding academic year:
(a) The number of students that  applied and were accepted into public universities under sub-
sections (1) to (5) of this section; and
(b) The financial impact  of subsections (1) to (5) of this section on public universities listed in
ORS 352.002.
(8) A student who is not a citizen or  a lawful permanent resident of the United States, or who
is a refugee, special immigrant visa  holder or COFA islander, is eligible to receive scholarships and
other financial aid from public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(9) As used in this section:
(a) “Asylum seeker” means an  individual with a pending application for asylum under 8
U.S.C. 1158.
[(a)] (b) “COFA islander” means an individual who legally entered  the United States under a
Compact of Free Association treaty between the United States and any of the following countries:
(A) The Republic of Palau;
(B) The Republic of the Marshall Islands; or
(C) The Federated States of Micronesia.
[(b)] (c) “Refugee” means an individual who is  granted refugee status for admission to the
United States by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.
[(c)] (d) “Special immigrant visa holder” means:
(A) An individual from Iraq or Afghanistan who was provided  with the status of special immi-
grant by the United States Department of Homeland Security under:
(i) Section 1059(a) of the National Defense Authorization  Act for Fiscal Year 2006, P.L. 109-163,
119 Stat. 3444;
Enrolled House Bill 2586 (HB 2586-A) Page 2
(ii) Section 1244(b) of the Refugee Crisis in Iraq Act of 2007, P.L. 110-181, 122 Stat. 397; or
(iii) Section 602(b) of the Afghan Allies Protection Act of 2009, P.L. 111-8, 123 Stat. 807; or
(B) An individual who is granted humanitarian parole, asylum, conditional permanent  residency
or temporary protected status  by the United States Department of Homeland Security or other fed-
eral agency.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 353.123 is amended to read:
353.123. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b)  and (c) of this subsection, the Oregon Health
and Science University Board of Directors may exempt a  student who is not a citizen or a lawful
permanent resident of the United  States from paying nonresident tuition and fees for enrollment at
Oregon Health and Science University consistent with policies adopted by the board or  by univer-
sity officials acting under authority of the board.
(b) A student  who is a COFA islander and who has not previously established residence in any
state or  territory of the United States or the District of Columbia other than Oregon shall qualify
for exemption from nonresident  tuition and fees for enrollment as an undergraduate student and as
a graduate student in a degree program at Oregon Health and Science University.
(c) A student who is a refugee , asylum seeker  or  special immigrant visa holder and who has
not previously established  residence in any state or territory of the United States or the District
of Columbia other than Oregon shall qualify for exemption from  nonresident tuition and fees for
enrollment as an undergraduate student and as a graduate student in a degree  program at Oregon
Health and Science University.
(2) A student who is not a citizen or  a lawful permanent resident of the United States, or who
is a refugee, asylum seeker,  special immigrant visa holder or COFA islander,  is eligible to receive
scholarships and other financial aid from the university consistent  with policies adopted by the
board or university officials acting under the authority of the board.
(3) As used in this section, “asylum seeker,”  “COFA islander,” “refugee” and  “special immi-
grant visa holder” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 352.287.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2586 (HB 2586-A) Page 3